Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.210

Execution of warrant.

The officer shall execute the writ [warrant] by bringing the person therein named before the court or judge, and the like return of proceedings shall be required and had as in case of writs of habeas corpus.

[Code 1881 s 684; 1877 p 141 s 688; 1869 p 159 s 624; 1854 p 214 s 452; RRS s 1082.]